Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4156.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.30, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12a. new text end new text begin Remote test administration. new text end new text begin (a) An enrolling district providing digital instruction in accordance with section 124D.094, subdivision 2, to students enrolled on a full-time basis may administer a state assessment required under this section to its enrolled students in a virtual setting that aligns with the students' regular academic instruction if: new text end new text begin (1) the student completes the assessment on an assigned date and at an assigned time scheduled by the enrolling district during the same test administration window designated by the commissioner for the assessments; new text end new text begin (2) the student attends a synchronous assessment session initiated and managed by designated staff of the enrolling district; new text end new text begin (3) the student takes the assessment using a device that the assessment proctor uses to monitor the student through video for the duration of the assessment administration; new text end new text begin (4) the student uses one device to take the assessment and a second device that allows an assessment proctor to monitor the administration if the assessment platform does not allow integrated camera proctoring, except that a second device is not required if the assessment platform allows the proctor to view the student and background; new text end new text begin (5) the enrolling district seeks to maintain a student assessment taker to assessment proctor ratio of ten to one or lower; new text end new text begin (6) the student does not exit the assessment administration until instructed to do so by the assessment proctor; and new text end new text begin (7) the assessment submission is verified by the assessment proctor. new text end new text begin (b) This subdivision does not apply to college readiness or workforce readiness assessments provided by a national college and career readiness assessment provider. new text end new text begin (c) Assessment administration and data under this subdivision must be consistent with section 13.32. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 2. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 10, article 2, section 24, subdivision 29, is amended to read: Subd. 29. Statewide testing and reporting system. (a) For the statewide testing and reporting system under Minnesota Statutes, sections 120B.302 and 120B.305: $ 10,892,000 ..... 2026 $ deleted text begin 10,892,000 deleted text end new text begin 11,092,000 new text end ..... 2027 new text begin (b) Of these amounts, $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 must be used to implement remote assessments. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end Any balance remaining in fiscal year 2026 is available in fiscal year 2027. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end